Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 6. Directors, Officers, Employees, and Agents.

Sec. 10.06.450.
Board of directors; duty of care; right of inspection; dissent.

All corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of a corporation shall be managed under the direction of, a board of directors except as may be otherwise provided in this chapter. If a provision is made under AS

10.06.468

or in the articles, the powers, duties, privileges, and liabilities conferred or imposed upon the board by this chapter shall be exercised, performed, extended, and assumed to the extent and by the person or persons to whom they are delegated as provided in AS

10.06.468

or in the articles. Directors need not be residents of this state or shareholders of the corporation unless required by the articles or bylaws. The articles or bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors. The board may fix the compensation of directors unless otherwise provided in the articles.

A director shall perform the duties of a director, including duties as a member of a committee of the board on which the director may serve, in good faith, in a manner the director reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation, and with the care, including reasonable inquiry, that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances. Except as provided in (c) of this section, a director is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, in each case prepared or presented by

one or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters that the director reasonably believes to be within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

a committee of the board upon which the director does not serve, designated in accordance with a provision of the articles or the bylaws, as to matters within the authority of the committee if the director reasonably believes the committee to merit confidence.

A director is not acting in good faith if the director has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by (b) of this section unwarranted.

A director has the absolute right at a reasonable time to inspect and copy all books, records, and documents of every kind and to inspect the physical properties of the corporation or a domestic or foreign subsidiary of the corporation. Inspection by a director may be made in person or by agent or attorney and the right of inspection includes the right to copy and make extracts. This section applies to a director of a foreign corporation having its principal executive office in this state or customarily holding meetings of its board in this state.

A director of a corporation who is present at a meeting of its board at which action on a corporate matter is taken is presumed to have assented to the action taken unless the director’s dissent is entered in the minutes of the meeting or unless the director files a written dissent to the action with the secretary of the meeting before adjournment or forwards the dissent by certified mail to the secretary of the corporation immediately after adjournment. The right to dissent does not apply to a director who voted in favor of the action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 34 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989 the word “extracts” was substituted for “contracts” at the end of the second sentence of (d) of this section to correct a manifest error in the original enactment.

Cross references. —

For provision that articles of incorporation may include certain limitations on a director’s liability, see
AS

10.06.210

(1)(M).

Sec. 10.06.453.
Number, election, and tenure of directors; initial directors.

The board of directors shall consist of one or more members. The number of directors shall be fixed by, or in the manner provided in, the bylaws, unless the articles fix the number of directors, in which case a change in the number of directors shall be made only by amendment of the articles. If the number of directors is not otherwise set, the number of directors is three.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

10.06.230

and this section, the number of directors may be increased or decreased by amendment of the articles or the bylaws or by action of the board or the shareholders under the specific provisions of an article or a bylaw adopted by approval of the outstanding shares. A change in the number of directors, including by amendment of the articles, is subject to the following limitations:

if the board is authorized by the articles or the bylaws to change the number of directors, whether by amending the bylaws or by taking action under the specific provision of an article or a bylaw adopted by approval of the outstanding shares, the amendment or action shall require the vote of a majority of the entire board;

a decrease in the number of directors may not shorten the term of an incumbent director.

The articles may provide for the election of one or more directors by the holders of the shares of a class or series voting as a class or series.

The names and addresses of the members of the first board may be stated in the articles. The members of the first board hold office until the first annual meeting of shareholders, and until their successors have been elected and qualified.

At the first annual meeting of shareholders and at each subsequent annual meeting the shareholders shall elect directors to hold office until the next succeeding annual meeting, except in the case of the classification of directors as permitted by AS

10.06.455

. A director, including a director elected to fill a vacancy, shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which elected and until a successor has been elected and qualified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 35, 36 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 57(a) and (b),
ch. 82, SLA 1989, provide
—
(a) Notwithstanding
AS

10.06.453(e)

and

10.06.455

, if a corporation is organized under
43 U.S.C. 1601 — 1629e and if the corporation’s bylaws, as the bylaws exist immediately before July 1, 1989, contain a provision that complies with former AS 10.05 and provides for a board of directors consisting of three or fewer classes of directors with terms of office extending not longer than the third annual meeting after the directors’ election, the corporation may continue to elect directors in the classes and for the terms provided under the bylaws.

“(b) The application of (a) of this section terminates if on or after July 1, 1989, the corporation modifies or eliminates the provisions of the corporation’s bylaws on the classification and terms of office of the corporation’s directors.”

Sec. 10.06.455.
Classification of directors.

If the board consists of three or more members, the articles of incorporation may provide that instead of electing all the directors annually the directors be divided into either two or three classes, each class to be as nearly equal in number as possible, with the term of office of directors of the first class to expire at the first annual meeting of shareholders after their election, that of the second class to expire at the second annual meeting after their election, and that of the third class, if any, to expire at the third annual meeting after their election. At each annual meeting after the classification the number of directors equal to the number of the class whose term expires at the time of the meeting shall be elected to hold office until the second succeeding annual meeting if there are two classes, or until the third succeeding annual meeting if there are three classes. A classification of directors is not effective before the first annual meeting of shareholders.

Unless cumulative voting rights under AS

10.06.420(d)

have been eliminated by the articles of incorporation, an amendment of the articles that would establish or require classification of the board under (a) of this section may not be adopted if the votes cast against the amendment would be sufficient to elect a director if voted cumulatively at an election of the entire board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 131 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For applicability of this section to certain existing corporations, see § 57, ch. 82, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts or the editor’s notes at AS

10.06.453

.

Sec. 10.06.458.
Declaration of board vacancy where director of unsound mind.

The board may declare vacant the office of a director who has been declared of unsound mind by a court order.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.460.
Removal of director without cause.

At a regular or special meeting for which notice is given under AS

10.06.410

and this section, any or all of the directors may be removed without reason if the removal is approved by the outstanding shares, subject to the following:

in the case of a corporation with 500 or more holders of record entitled to vote on the removal and election of directors, as determined under AS

10.06.408

, written or printed notice of intention to seek removal under this section shall be delivered either personally or by mail to each shareholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting and if notice of intention to seek removal under this section is

delivered to the president or secretary of the corporation at least 75 days before the date of the annual meeting it shall be included on the notice stating the place, day, and hour of the annual meeting without cost to the shareholder seeking removal; or

not timely under (A) of this paragraph the shareholder seeking removal may, at the expense of that shareholder, deliver either personally or by mail the notice required by (1) of this subsection at any time up to 20 days before the date set for the annual meeting; if mailed, notice is considered delivered when deposited with postage prepaid in the United States mail addressed to the shareholder at the address appearing on the stock transfer books of the corporation;

unless cumulative voting rights under AS

10.06.420(d)

have been eliminated by the articles of incorporation, a director may not be removed, unless the entire board is removed, if the votes cast against removal would be sufficient to elect a director if voted cumulatively at an election at which the same total number of votes were cast; and

if by provision in the articles of incorporation the holders of the shares of a class or series, voting as a class or series, are entitled to elect one or more directors, a director elected in that manner may be removed only by the applicable vote of the holders of the shares of that class or series.

Except as provided in this section and AS

10.06.458

,

10.06.463

, and

10.06.465(c)

, a director may not be removed before the expiration of the term of office of the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cited in

Borer v. Eyak Corp., 507 P.3d 49 (Alaska 2022).

Sec. 10.06.463.
Removal of director by superior court.

The superior court may, at the suit of the board or the shareholders holding at least 10 percent of the number of outstanding shares of any class, remove from office a director for fraudulent or dishonest acts, gross neglect of duty, or gross abuse of authority or discretion with reference to the corporation and may bar from reelection a director removed in that manner for a period prescribed by the court. The corporation shall be made a party to the suit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rule of Civil Procedure 19, see sec. 19, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.465.
Vacancies and resignation; special meeting of shareholders.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws of the corporation and except for a vacancy created by the removal of a director, vacancies on the board may be filled by a majority of the directors then in office, whether or not less than a quorum, or by a sole remaining director. Unless the articles or a bylaw adopted with approval of the outstanding shares provide that the board may fill vacancies occurring in the board by reason of removal of directors, the vacancies may be filled only by approval of the shareholders.

The shareholders may elect a director to fill a vacancy not filled by the directors. An election by written consent to fill a vacancy requires the consent of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote.

If, after the filling of a vacancy by the directors, the directors who have been elected by the shareholders constitute less than a majority of the directors, a holder or holders of an aggregate of 10 percent or more of the shares outstanding at the time may call a special meeting of shareholders under AS

10.06.405

to elect the entire board. The term of office of a director terminates upon the election and qualification of a successor.

Notwithstanding AS

10.06.453(e)

, a director may resign effective upon giving written notice to the chairman of the board, the president, the secretary, or the board of directors of the corporation, unless the notice specifies a later time for the effectiveness of the resignation. If the resignation is effective at a future time, a successor may be elected to take office when the resignation becomes effective.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 37 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Collateral references. —

Provision authorizing directors to fill vacancies as applicable to newly created directorships. 6 ALR2d 174.

Sec. 10.06.468.
Executive and other board committees.

If authorized by the articles or the bylaws of the corporation, the board, by resolution adopted by a majority of the entire board, may designate from among its members an executive committee and other committees of the board. Unless the number of directors fixed in accordance with AS

10.06.453

is less than three, each committee shall have at least two members, who serve at the pleasure of the board of directors. Each committee, to the extent provided in the resolution or the articles or bylaws of the corporation, has the authority of the board, except that a committee may not

declare dividends or distributions;

approve or recommend to shareholders actions or proposals required by this chapter to be approved by shareholders;

designate candidates for the office of director, for purposes of proxy solicitation or otherwise, or fill vacancies on the board or any committee of the board;

amend the bylaws;

approve a plan or merger not requiring shareholder approval;

capitalize retained earnings;

authorize or approve the reacquisition of shares unless under a general formula or method specified by the board;

authorize or approve the issuance or sale of, or a contract to issue or sell, shares or designate the terms of a series of a class of shares, unless the board, having acted regarding general authorization for the issuance or sale of shares, a contract to issue or sell, or the designation of a series, authorizes a committee, under a general formula or method specified by the board by resolution or by adoption of a stock option or other plan, to fix the terms of a contract for the sale of the shares and to fix the terms upon which the shares may be issued or sold, including, without limitation, the price, the dividend rate, provisions for redemption, sinking funds, conversion, voting or preferential rights, and provisions for other features of a class of shares, or a series of a class of shares, with full power in the committee to adopt a final resolution setting out all the terms of a series for filing with the commissioner under this chapter; or

authorize, approve, or ratify contracts or other transactions between the corporation and one or more of its directors, or between the corporation and a corporation, firm, or association in which one or more of its directors has a material financial interest under AS

10.06.478

.

The designation of a committee, the delegation to the committee of authority, or action by the committee under that authority does not alone constitute compliance by a member of the board or the committee in question with the responsibility to act in good faith, in a manner the member reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation, and with the care, including reasonable inquiry, as an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.470.
Meetings: call, place, notice, and waiver.

A regular or special meeting of the board or a committee of the board may be called by the chair of the board, the president, a vice-president, the secretary, or a director and may be held at any place designated under the bylaws inside or outside the state, by remote communication, or at a designated place inside or outside the state and by remote communication. A member of the board or of a committee of the board participating in a meeting by remote communication is considered to be present in person at the meeting for the purposes of reaching a quorum under AS

10.06.473

and for voting at the meeting.

A regular meeting of the board or a committee designated by the board may be held without notice if the time and place of the meeting is fixed by the bylaws or the board. A special meeting of the board or a committee designated by the board shall be held as provided in the bylaws or, in the absence of bylaw provision, after either notice in writing sent 10 days before the meeting or notice by electronic means, personal messenger, or comparable person-to-person communication given at least 72 hours before the meeting. Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws the notice of a special meeting shall include disclosure of the business to be transacted and the purpose of the meeting.

Notice of a meeting need not be given to a director who signs a waiver of notice, whether before or after the meeting, or who attends the meeting without protesting before the meeting or at its commencement the lack of notice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 38, 39 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 14 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “designated under the bylaws” following “held at any place” and “, by remote communication, or at a designated place inside or outside the state and by remote communication” at the end, added the second sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to (a) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.473.
Quorum of directors.

A majority of the number of directors fixed by the articles or bylaws of a corporation constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business unless a greater number is required by the articles or bylaws. The act of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present is the act of the board, unless the act of a greater number is required by the articles or the bylaws.

The provisions of this section apply with equal force to committees of the board established under AS

10.06.468

and action by committees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.475.
Alternative meeting arrangements; informal action by directors.

Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws of the corporation, the board of a corporation or a committee designated by the board can validly conduct a meeting by communicating simultaneously with each other by means of conference telephones or similar communications equipment.

Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws of the corporation, action required or permitted to be taken by the board or a committee designated by the board may be taken without a meeting on written consents, identical in content, setting out the action taken and signed by all the members of the board or the committee. The written consents shall be filed with the minutes. The consents have the same effect as a unanimous vote.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.478.
Director conflicts of interest.

A contract or other transaction between a corporation and one or more of the directors of the corporation, or between a corporation and a corporation, firm, or association in which one or more of the directors of the corporation has a material financial interest, is neither void nor voidable because the director or directors or the other corporation, firm, or association are parties or because the director or directors are present at the meeting of the board that authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction, if the material facts as to the transaction and as to the director’s interest are fully disclosed or known to the

shareholders and the contract or transaction is approved by the shareholders in good faith, with the shares owned by the interested director or directors not being entitled to vote; or

board, and the board authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction in good faith by a sufficient vote without counting the vote of the interested director or directors, and the person asserting the validity of the contract or transaction sustains the burden of proving that the contract or transaction was just and reasonable as to the corporation at the time it was authorized, approved, or ratified.

A common directorship does not alone constitute a material financial interest within the meaning of this section. A director is not interested within the meaning of this section in a resolution fixing the compensation of another director as a director, officer, or employee of the corporation, notwithstanding the fact that the first director is also receiving compensation from the corporation.

A contract or other transaction between a corporation and a corporation or association of which one or more directors of the corporation are directors is neither void nor voidable because the director or directors are present at the meeting of the board that authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction, if the material facts of the transaction and the director’s other directorship are fully disclosed or known to the board and the board authorizes, approves, or ratifies the contract or transaction in good faith by a sufficient vote without counting the vote of the common director or directors or the contract or transaction is approved by the shareholders in good faith. This subsection does not apply to contracts or transactions covered by (a) of this section.

Interested or common directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the board that authorizes, approves, or ratifies a contract or transaction.

Nothing in this section affects the prohibitions or restraints imposed by AS 45.50.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.480.
Liability of directors and contributions from shareholders and other directors.

In addition to other liabilities, a director is liable in the following circumstances unless the director complies with the standard provided in AS

10.06.450(b)

for the performance of the duties of directors:

a director who votes for or assents to a distribution to the corporation’s shareholders contrary to the provisions of AS

10.06.358

,

10.06.360

,

10.06.363

, or

10.06.365

or contrary to a restriction in the articles of incorporation is liable to the corporation, jointly and severally with all other directors voting for or assenting to the distribution, for the amount of the distribution that is paid or the value of the assets that are distributed in excess of the amount of the distribution that could have been paid or distributed without violation of AS

10.06.305

—

10.06.390

or the restrictions of the articles of incorporation;

a director who votes for or assents to a distribution to the corporation’s shareholders during the liquidation of the corporation without the payment and discharge of, or making adequate provision for, all known debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation is liable to the corporation, jointly and severally with all other directors voting for or assenting to distribution, for the value of the assets that are distributed, to the extent that the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation are not thereafter paid and discharged;

a director who votes for or assents to a loan of assets of the corporation to an officer or employee or a loan secured by the corporation’s shares contrary to the provisions of AS

10.06.485

or contrary to a restriction in the articles of incorporation is liable to the corporation, jointly and severally with all other directors voting for or assenting to the loan, for the amount of the loan that is in excess of a loan that could have been extended without a violation of AS

10.06.485

or the restriction in the articles of incorporation.

A director against whom a claim is asserted under this section for the distribution of assets of the corporation is entitled to contribution from shareholders who accepted or received the assets, knowing the distribution to have been made in violation of this chapter, in proportion to the amounts received by them. A director against whom a claim is asserted under this section for the extension of a loan is entitled to contribution from the person receiving the loan.

A director against whom a claim is asserted under this section is entitled to contribution from other directors who voted for or assented to the action upon which the claim is asserted.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 20 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Legislative history reports. —

For purpose of the amendment made by § 20,
ch. 21, SLA 2000 (CSHB 435 (JUD)), see 2000 House Journal Supp. No. 10 (July 19, 2000).

Sec. 10.06.483.
Officers; tenure, resignation, authority, and duties.

A corporation shall have a president, a secretary, a treasurer, and other officers with titles and duties as stated in the bylaws of the corporation or determined by the board and as may be necessary to enable the corporation to sign instruments and share certificates. Any two or more offices may be held by the same person, except the offices of president and secretary. When all of the issued and outstanding stock of the corporation is owned by one person, the person may hold all or any combination of offices.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws of the corporation, officers shall be chosen by the board and serve at the pleasure of the board, subject to the rights, if any, of an officer under a contract of employment. An officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the corporation without prejudice to the rights, if any, of the corporation under a contract to which the officer is a party.

All officers as between themselves and the corporation have the authority and shall perform the duties in the management of the corporation as provided in the bylaws of the corporation or, to the extent not provided in the bylaws, as provided by the board.

Subject to the provisions of AS

10.06.020

, a note, mortgage, evidence of indebtedness, contract, conveyance, or other instrument in writing, and an assignment or endorsement of these, executed or entered into between the corporation and another person, if signed by two individuals, one of whom is the chairman of the board, the president, or a vice-president and the other of whom is the secretary, an assistant secretary, the treasurer, or an assistant treasurer of the corporation, is not invalidated as to the corporation by a lack of authority of the signing officers in the absence of actual knowledge on the part of the other person that the signing officers had no authority to execute the instrument.

An officer shall perform the duties of the office in good faith and with that degree of care, including reasonable inquiry, that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances. Except as provided in (f) of this section, an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports or statements, including financial statements and other financial data in each case prepared or presented by legal counsel or public accountants.

An officer is not acting in good faith if the officer has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by (e) of this section unwarranted.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 40 — 42 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.485.
Loans to directors, officers, and employees.

A loan may not be extended to an officer or employee without authorization by the board. A loan may not be extended to a director without the approval of two-thirds of the voting shares. An employee or officer who is also a director is considered a director for purposes of this section. A shareholder is not disqualified from voting on a loan to a shareholder as a director because of personal interest.

A loan to a director, officer, or employee and a loan secured by the shares of the corporation may not be made unless the loan would be permissible as a distribution under AS

10.06.358

—

10.06.365

. A loan under this subsection impairs the retained earnings or paid-in capital accounts to the extent of the loan.

For purposes of this section, a loan may consist of cash, securities, or personal or real property.

If a corporation acts as a guarantor on a loan to a director, officer, or employee, the guarantee is treated as a loan under this section.

A director, officer, or employee of an affiliate corporation is a director, officer, or employee of the lending corporation for purposes of this section.

A loan is to be judged by the duties of directors and officers to act in good faith in a manner reasonably believed to be in the best interests of the corporation and with the care, including reasonable inquiry, that an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would use under similar circumstances.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.490.
Indemnification of officers, directors, employees, and agents; insurance.

A corporation may indemnify a person who was, is, or is threatened to be made a party to a completed, pending, or threatened action or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative, other than an action by or in the right of the corporation, by reason of the fact that the person is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise. Indemnification may include reimbursement of expenses, attorney fees, judgments, fines, and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by the person in connection with the action or proceeding if the person acted in good faith and in a manner the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to a criminal action or proceeding, the person had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct was unlawful. The termination of an action or proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent, does not create a presumption that the person did not act in good faith and in a manner which the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation, and, with respect to a criminal action or proceeding, the person had reasonable cause to believe that the conduct was unlawful.

A corporation may indemnify a person who was, is, or is threatened to be made a party to a completed, pending, or threatened action by or in the right of the corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that the person is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise. Indemnification may include reimbursement for expenses and attorney fees actually and reasonably incurred by the person in connection with the defense or settlement of the action if the person acted in good faith and in a manner the person reasonably believed to be in or not opposed to the best interests of the corporation. Indemnification may not be made in respect of any claim, issue, or matter as to which the person has been adjudged to be liable for negligence or misconduct in the performance of the person’s duty to the corporation except to the extent that the court in which the action was brought determines upon application that, despite the adjudication of liability, in view of all the circumstances of the case, the person is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for expenses that the court considers proper.

To the extent that a director, officer, employee, or agent of a corporation has been successful on the merits or otherwise in defense of an action or proceeding referred to in (a) or (b) of this section, or in defense of a claim, issue, or matter in the action or proceeding, the director, officer, employee, or agent shall be indemnified against expenses and attorney fees actually and reasonably incurred in connection with the defense.

Unless otherwise ordered by a court, indemnification under (a) or (b) of this section may only be made by a corporation upon a determination that indemnification of the director, officer, employee, or agent is proper in the circumstances because the director, officer, employee, or agent has met the applicable standard of conduct set out in (a) and (b) of this section. The determination shall be made by

the board by a majority vote of a quorum consisting of directors who were not parties to the action or proceeding;

independent legal counsel in a written opinion if a quorum under (1) of this subsection is

not obtainable; or

obtainable but a majority of disinterested directors so directs; or

approval of the outstanding shares.

The corporation may pay or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred in defending a civil or criminal action or proceeding in advance of the final disposition in the manner provided in (d) of this section if

in the case of a director or officer, the director or officer furnishes the corporation with a written affirmation of a good faith belief that the standard of conduct described in AS

10.06.450(b)

or

10.06.483(e)

has been met;

the director, officer, employee, or agent furnishes the corporation a written unlimited general undertaking, executed personally or on behalf of the individual, to repay the advance if it is ultimately determined that an applicable standard of conduct was not met; and

a determination is made that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this chapter.

The indemnification provided by this section is not exclusive of any other rights to which a person seeking indemnification may be entitled under a bylaw, agreement, vote of shareholders or disinterested directors, or otherwise, both as to action in the official capacity of the person and as to action in another capacity while holding the office. The right to indemnification continues as to a person who has ceased to be a director, officer, employee, or agent, and inures to the benefit of the heirs, executors, and administrators of the person.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a person who is or was a director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the corporation as a director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise against any liability asserted against the person and incurred by the person in that capacity, or arising out of that status, whether or not the corporation has the power to indemnify the person against the liability under the provisions of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11, ch. 166, SLA 1988, as amended by sec. 58, ch. 50, SLA 1989, provides: “AS

10.06.490

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, governs a proposed indemnification by a corporation after July 1, 1989, whether the events upon which the indemnification is based occurred before or after July 1, 1989.
A statement relating to indemnification contained in the articles or bylaws of a corporation on July 1, 1989 may limit the indemnification permitted by AS

10.06.490

if the statement expressly states that indemnification is limited.”